Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 43.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201021-143
Power of personal representative of
deceased member.

(ULLCA
504) If a member dies, the deceased member's personal representative or other
legal representative may exercise the rights of a transferee provided in subsection
(c) of section 21-141 and, for the purposes of settling the estate, the rights
of a current member under section 21-139.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 43.
January 1, 2011